Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-15,105
Federal exemptions; rejected.

The federal exemptions provided in 11 U.S.C. 522, subsection (d), are hereby rejected by the State of Nebraska. The State of Nebraska elects to retain the personal exemptions provided under Nebraska statutes and the Nebraska Constitution and to have such exemptions apply to any bankruptcy petition filed in Nebraska after April 17, 1980.

Laws 1980, LB 940, § 1.

Exemptions, see section 25-1552 et seq.

Homestead exemption, see section 40-101.

Insurance exemption, see section 44-371.